West Virginia, session 2026, HB4269.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Department of Agriculture. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 8, 2025, authorized under the authority of §19-11E-8 of this code, modified by the Department of Agriculture to meet the objections of the Legislative Rule-Making Review Committee and refiled in the State Register on September 24, 2025, relating to the Department of Agriculture (Grade A pasteurized milk, 61 CSR 15), is authorized.